Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-261
Profits and losses; allocation.

The profits and losses of a limited partnership shall be allocated among the partners, and among classes or groups of partners, in the manner provided in the partnership agreement. If the partnership agreement does not so provide, profits and losses shall be allocated on the basis of the agreed value, as stated in the records of the limited partnership, of the contributions made by each partner to the extent they have been received by the limited partnership and have not been returned.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 29;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 35.